Massachusetts, session 194th, H3656.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 78. Public Inspections
(a) For purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following definitions:
“inspection functions” shall mean construction inspections, bridge inspections, contract
administration, quality control inspection, material testing, and resident engineer functions;
“public employee” shall mean an employee of a federal, state or local government
of 2

(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, public employees shall
carry out the inspection functions for all surface transportation projects receiving State or Federal
funding
of 2